Massachusetts, session 194th, H742.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 1C1/2 the
following section:-
Section 1C ¼. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a school
district may opt out of any state non-income-based free lunch program, including a program
required pursuant to section 1C. A school district that chooses not to participate in a non-income-
based free lunch program may obtain and utilize for other purposes the funds that would be
directed to the school district from the commonwealth under the program.
(b) If a school district does not choose to opt out of a state non-income-based free lunch
program pursuant to subsection (a), a student’s parent or guardian may choose to opt out of the
of 2

program. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the student’s parent or guardian chooses not
to have the student participate in the free lunch program, the student may purchase school lunch
at a rate set by the school district. The school district shall not count the non-participating student
for the purposes of securing funds under the free lunch program. Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, the school district may obtain and utilize for other purposes the funds that would be
directed to the school district from the commonwealth if the non-participating student were
counted for purposes of the program, as determined by the board.
of 2